apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
<p lankton "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lanologi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lanospora "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lantase "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lanula "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lasenta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p laser "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lasma "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lasmodium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastid "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastisitas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastogami "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastometer "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lastron "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latelet "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latform "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latina "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latinoid "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latinum "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latisma "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lato "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p latonisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p laza "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lebisit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leidoi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leiogami "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leistosen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leksus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lengkung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leonasme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leopod "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lerem "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lester "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p letora "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p leura "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p linteng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lintit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p liosaurus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p liosen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lombir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lonci "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lonco "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p losif "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lot "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lug "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lumbago "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lumbung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luralis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luralisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luriform "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luto "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lutokrasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p lutonium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luviograf "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p luviometer "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p neumatika "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p neumatokista "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p neumonia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p o "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oces "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oci "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ocong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p odemporem "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p odium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oetika "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p of "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ogrom "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ohon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oikilohalin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oikiloterm "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oint "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oise "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oiseuille "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ojok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oker "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oket "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p okok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p okrol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oksai "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ola "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olarimeter "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olarimetri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olaris "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olarisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olaritas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p older "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olemik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olenter "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oles "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olet "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliandri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliantus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliester "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olifase "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olifoni "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oligami "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oligini "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oligon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oligraf "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olihalin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olikel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliket "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliklinik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olikrom "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olikultur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olimer "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olimerisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olinia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olio "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olip "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olipeptida "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliploid "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olipropilena "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisakarida "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisemi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisentrisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisilogisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olisindeton "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olispermi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olister "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olitbiro "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliteis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliteisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliteknik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olitena "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olitik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olitikus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olitisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oliuretan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olivini "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olizoa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olka "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olkadot "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olones "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olonium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olonter "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olusi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p olutan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p omade "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p omologi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ompa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ompang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ompon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ompong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p on "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onakan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onco "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onderabilitas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ondoh "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ondok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ondong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onggang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ongkol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ongsu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oni "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p onor "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ons "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orfiria "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ori "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orno "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oros "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orositas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orselen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orsi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ortal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ortepel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ortik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ortir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p orto "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ortofolio "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p os "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ose "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p osisi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ositivisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ositron "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ositronium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oskar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oso "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p osologi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ostar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oster "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p osterior "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ostulat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ostur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ot "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otasium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otator "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otehi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otensi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otensial "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otensiometer "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otlot "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p otret "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oundal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p oyang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raanggapan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rabu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p radana "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p radesa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p radesain "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raduga "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ragmatika "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p ragmatisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rahara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rahoto "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rairi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raja "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rajaksa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rajurit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakala "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakarsa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakarya "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakata "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakilang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakondisi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rakonsepsi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raksis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raktek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raktikan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raktikum "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p raktisi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<p rameswari "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
